Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
CIRCUITS AND JUDGES

§603-1 Judicial circuits. The State is
divided into four judicial circuits, as follows:

(1) The first judicial circuit is the island of Oahu
and all other islands belonging to the State not hereinafter mentioned;

(2) The second judicial circuit includes the islands
of Maui, Molokai, Lanai, Kahoolawe, and Molokini;

(3) The third judicial circuit is the island of
Hawaii;

(4) The fifth judicial circuit includes the islands
of Kauai and Niihau. [L 1892, c 57, §29; am L 1913, c 34, §1; RL 1925, §2234;
RL 1935, §3630; am L 1943, c 141, §1(a); RL 1945, §9631; RL 1955, §215-1; HRS
§603-1; am L 1994, c 103, §1]

Cross References

These circuits as "districts" within meaning of
Const. art. I, §14, see §806-17.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next